Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 4. Employee Benefits
§ 27-14-406.
Permanent total disability; benefits.

Subject to W.S.

27-14-602

, upon certification by a physician licensed to practice surgery or medicine that an injury results in permanent total disability as defined under W.S. 27-14-102(a)(xvi), an injured employee shall receive for eighty (80) months a monthly payment as provided by W.S. 27-14-403(c) and dependent children shall receive an award as provided by W.S. 27-14-403(b). The eighty (80) month period shall be reduced by the number of months for which previous awards under W.S.

27-14-405

were made for the injury that resulted in the determination of permanent total disability, with the injured worker receiving the monthly amount calculated pursuant to W.S. 27-14-403(c) for the balance of the eighty (80) month period. The monthly payment amount computed under W.S. 27-14-403(c) and any amount awarded under W.S.

27-14-408

shall constitute the exclusive benefit for both the physical impairment and the economic loss resulting from an injury, including loss of earnings, extra expenses associated with the injury and vocational rehabilitation. An employee shall not receive benefits under this section if receiving benefits under W.S.

27-14-404

or

27-14-405

.

This section specifies the length of time amounts computed pursuant to W.S. 27-14-403(c) are to be awarded and except for amounts awarded under W.S.

27-14-408

, shall not be construed to allow awards in excess of the amounts computed pursuant to W.S. 27-14-403(c).

Any objection to a final determination pursuant to this section shall be referred to the medical commission for hearing by a medical hearing panel acting as hearing examiner pursuant to W.S.

27-14-616

.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1993, ch. 229, § 2; 1994, ch. 86, § 2; 2015 ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the first sentence, deleted “less any previous awards under W.S.

27-14-405

which were involved in the determination of permanent total disability” preceding “and dependent children” and made a related change, and inserted the present second sentence.

Total disability should not be declared permanent unless certain. —

Carter Oil Co. v. Gibson, 34 Wyo. 53, 241 P. 219,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 1925);
Cardin v. Morrison-Knudsen, 603 P.2d 862,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 487

(Wyo. 1979).

Award for “permanent total disability” will be made only in clear case. Standard Oil Co. v. Sullivan, 33 Wyo. 223, 237 P. 253,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1925).

Except in cases of permanent disability described in statute, total disability should not be declared permanent unless it appears clearly that affliction will not yield to treatment and workman will never be able to work at any gainful occupation. In re Iles, 56 Wyo. 443, 110 P.2d 826,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1941).

Circumstances indicating necessity for award. —

Aside from injuries specifically described in statute, award for permanent total disability should not be made unless affliction will not yield to treatment and workman never will be able to work at any gainful occupation, and unless it so appears award should be for temporary total disability. Standard Oil Co. v. Sullivan, 33 Wyo. 223, 237 P. 253,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1925).

Ability to perform light duty jobs. —

Although a workers'
compensation claimant sustained a serious lumbar injury that had not been medically resolved, for which he continued to receive treatment, and his injury prevented him from returning to the type of work he had done all of his life, the claimant was not entitled to permanent total disability benefits under the odd lot doctrine or Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-102(a)(xvi) because three doctors stated that the claimant was capable of gainful employment with restrictions and a vocational evaluator concluded claimant could find work in his geographic area in jobs such as cashier, rental clerk, telemarketer, desk clerk and customer representative.
Moss v. State, 2010 WY 66, 232 P.3d 1,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 2010).

Occasional employment allowed. —

One may be totally disabled for all practical purposes of competing for remunerative employment in any general field and yet obtain occasional employment under rare conditions at small remuneration. In re Iles, 56 Wyo. 443, 110 P.2d 826,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1941).

Psychological injury. —

Substantial evidence, including expert testimony from numerous doctors, supported the Medical Commission's determination that the psychiatric aid's disability was purely psychological and not caused by a compensable physical injury and thus, the Medical Commission did not err as a matter of law in determining it did not have statutory authority to award permanent total disability benefits. Hathaway v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2014 WY 12, 317 P.3d 590,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 2014).

Age of claimant as affecting working ability. —

The trial court's finding that the employee's age, even though he is now uninjured, prevents his engagement in employment for which he claims to have been qualified appears to be immaterial, providing the claimant is otherwise qualified to receive compensation. His working ability immediately prior to the accident may be taken into consideration by the court as a basis for computing the extent of permanent partial or total disability in awarding compensation. Long v. Big Horn Constr. Co., 75 Wyo. 276, 295 P.2d 750,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1956).

Burden of proof of injury on employee. —

The principle that compensation statutes in effect at time of compensable injury are applicable does not in any way relieve the employee of the burden to show the actual time of the compensable injury, its cause, and its relation to his employment at the time of injury. Bemis v. Texaco, Inc., 401 P.2d 708,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1965).

Burden of proof as to availability of work for employee on employer. —

Where employee is found permanently and totally disabled to do hard or manual work, but might do light work of a special nature not generally available, burden is on employer to show special work is available to employee. In re Iles, 56 Wyo. 443, 110 P.2d 826,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1941).

Where it is found that the employee is permanently and totally disabled so far as hard or manual work is concerned, but that he might do light work of a special nature not generally available, the burden is on the employer to show that such special work is available to the employee. Before the burden shifts to the employer, the employee must prove that he or she is so disabled that he or she will not be capable of employment in any well known branch of the labor market. Cardin v. Morrison-Knudsen, 603 P.2d 862,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 487

(Wyo. 1979).

Second compensation injury rule. —

There was no basis for disbelieving claimant's testimony that his leg gave out on him, as it had many times in the past and there was likewise no factual circumstance contained in the record that would have disallowed application of the second compensable injury rule, but indeed was a classic case of the application of that rule; thus, as was the case with his claim for permanent total disability, there was not substantial evidence in the record to support the conclusions to the contrary.
Nagle v. State ex rel. Wyo. Worker's Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Worker's Comp. Claim of Nagle), 2008 WY 99, 190 P.3d 159,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2008).

Court not bound by medical testimony. —

In making the factual determination of the extent of the claimant's injury, the trial court is not bound by medical testimony; nonmedical witnesses and other evidence may be relied on. Worker's Compensation Claim of Cannon v. FMC Corp., 718 P.2d 879,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 543

(Wyo. 1986).

Compensation statutes in effect at time of compensable injury are applicable. —

Bemis v. Texaco, Inc., 401 P.2d 708,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1965).

Where the injury was completely apparent and compensable when the workman filed his report of the accident in February 1965, the award for permanent partial disability should be based on the maximum amount allowable under former § 27-85 as amended by ch. 204, § 3, Laws 1961, rather than the amount allowable under former § 27-85 as amended by ch. 193, § 6, Laws 1965. Wyoming State Treas. ex rel. Workmen's Comp. Dep't v. Schultz, 444 P.2d 313,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1968).

But changes in compensation rates become integral part of employment status. —

Where claimant was injured in 1954 but returned to work and was subsequently disabled by increased arthritic changes in the original injury in 1963, it was held that changes in compensation rates had become an integral part of the employment status. Bemis v. Texaco, Inc., 400 P.2d 529,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 401 P.2d 708,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1965).

Increase from temporary to permanent justified award. —

Where former award of 331/3 percent permanent partial disability was made on expectancy that employee's condition would improve but employee's condition appeared worse at time of trial, judgment increasing award to that for permanent total disability will not be disturbed. In re Iles, 56 Wyo. 443, 110 P.2d 826,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1941).

Loss of fingers. —

Evidence showing employee's loss of fingers on both hands was held to justify award for permanent total disability. Sakamoto v. Kemmerer Coal Co., 36 Wyo. 325, 255 P. 356,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1927).

“Odd-lot doctrine”

provides that permanent total disability may be found in the case of workers who, while not altogether incapacitated for work, are so handicapped that they will not be employed regularly in any well known branch of the labor market. Schepanovich v. United States Steel Corp., 669 P.2d 522,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1983).

Test to be invoked as to application of “odd-lot doctrine”

is whether the workman is so disabled that the services which he is reasonably equipped to perform by his experience and training are not marketable in a well known branch of the labor market in the community so as to provide a steady and continuous source of income rather than sporadic or intermittent employment. Schepanovich v. United States Steel Corp., 669 P.2d 522,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1983).

In order to come within “odd-lot” doctrine, it is burden of the employee

to establish not only that he is no longer capable of working at the job in which he was employed at the time of his injury, but that the degree of obvious physical impairment, coupled with other facts, such as mental capacity, education, training, or age, must prima facie place him in that category. The burden of proof then shifts to the employer to establish that light work of a special nature which the employee could perform but which is not generally available was in fact available to him. City of Casper v. Bowdish, 713 P.2d 763,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 461

(Wyo. 1986); Anaya v. Holly Sugar Corp., 928 P.2d 473,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1996), reh'g denied,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. Jan. 6, 1997).

Injured worker failed to bring himself within “odd-lot doctrine,”

in light of doctor's testimony that his disability would not stop him from doing sedentary work, and testimony from employment security commission that there were many jobs generally available for which the worker would be educationally qualified. Lebsack v. Town of Torrington, 698 P.2d 1141,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 474

(Wyo. 1985).

The subjective determination of a worker's compensation claimant that he was too disabled to work or that a job search would have been futile on his part was not adequate to sustain his burden of producing evidence under the odd-lot doctrine. Anaya v. Holly Sugar Corp., 928 P.2d 473,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1996), reh'g denied,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. Jan. 6, 1997).

A worker's compensation claimant was not entitled to an award of permanent total disability benefits under the odd-lot doctrine where he failed to go forward with objective evidence that he was too disabled to work or that a job search would have been futile. Anaya v. Holly Sugar Corp., 928 P.2d 473,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1996), reh'g denied,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. Jan. 6, 1997).

“Odd-lot” claimant need not show total incapacity. —

An injured workman who comes within the “odd-lot doctrine” need not show that he is totally incapable of doing any work at all in order to be entitled to an award for permanent total disability. Schepanovich v. United States Steel Corp., 669 P.2d 522,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1983).

Previous impairment award. —

Although this section is ambiguous as to whether all previous impairment awards under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-14-405

must be deducted from a permanent total disability award, a reduction was proper where the claimant did not contend that any aspect of his impairment was unrelated to his permanent total disability.
State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2011 WY 57, 248 P.3d 1155,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 2011).

Stated

in

Sims v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div., 872 P.2d 555,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

Cordova v. Holly Sugar Corp., 882 P.2d 880,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 1994); Casper Oil Co. v. Evenson, 888 P.2d 221,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1995); Hernandez v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. 1 (In re Hernandez), 8 P.3d 318,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 2000); Phillips v. TIC-The Industrial Co. of Wyoming, Inc. (In re Phillips) 2005 WY 40, 109 P.3d 520,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(2005); Picozzi v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2013 WY 86, 304 P.3d 977,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Jul 16, 2013).

§ 27-14-407.
Forfeiture of benefits due to unsanitary or injurious practice.

If an injured employee knowingly engages or persists in an unsanitary or injurious practice which tends to imperil or retard his recovery, or if he refuses to submit to medical or surgical treatment reasonably essential to promote his recovery, he forfeits all right to compensation under this act. Forfeiture shall be determined by the hearing examiner upon application by the division or employer.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

To “persist” in injurious practices retarding injured employee's recovery means

to continue against opposition or remonstrance. In re Hibler, 37 Wyo. 332, 261 P. 648,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1927).

Proof required for injurious practices. —

More is required under this section than proof of a mere potential for harm or a possibility of harm; there must be proof that the worker's acts were not benign, but did, in some way, imperil or retard his recovery. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Bergeron, 948 P.2d 1367,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1997).

Employer had burden of proof that employee persisted

in injurious practices retarding recovery. In re Hibler, 37 Wyo. 332, 261 P. 648,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1927).

And that recovery was thus retarded. —

Burden is on employer to prove that workman's recovery has been retarded by persistence in injurious practices, and rule is the same when the employer asserts that workman has refused to submit to treatment reasonably essential to promote his recovery. Stanolind Oil & Gas Co. v. Harvey, 52 Wyo. 349, 75 P.2d 1,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1938).

Injurious pattern of conduct found. —

While the employee's acts of trimming the surgical pins, treating the injury with honey, not taking all of the antibiotics, returning to work even though the surgeon had not released the employee to do so, failing to wear the splint at all times, and pulling the pins out of the finger were not in and of themselves injurious practices, they demonstrated a pattern of conduct which supported the conclusion that the employee “persisted” in a course of action which “tended” to imperil or impede recovery. Celotex Corp. v. Andren (In re Andren), 917 P.2d 178,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1996).

Failure to report to alcohol detoxification program as ordered by court

constituted “an unsanitary or injurious practice which [tended] to imperil or retard his recovery,” so the district court did not err in terminating the claimant's benefits. Hanberg v. World Wide Constr., 741 P.2d 107,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 487

(Wyo. 1987).

Allergic reactions to substances in work environment. —

A claimant was diagnosed as suffering from allergic reactions to substances in his work environment and was treated with salves and lotions through 1984, when a doctor suggested to him that he change work to alleviate some of his symptoms. In 1986, he again sought medical advice, and was ordered to quit working. The district court properly found that the first specific medical enjoinder that the claimant received ordering him to end his job occurred in 1986, and his claim was timely under § 27-14-502(a), was not barred under this section, and was not the result of the claimant's own negligence. In re Meredith, 743 P.2d 874,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 515

(Wyo. 1987).

Injurious-practice defense was inappropriate

where there was no evidence to support a finding that returning to logging work imperiled or retarded the employee's recovery, and the employer did not present evidence that established the contrary. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Hollister, 794 P.2d 886,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1990).

Refusal to allow the use of blood products. —

Employee, who died from injuries suffered in a work-related car accident, did not forfeit all right to death benefits under the Wyoming Worker's Compensation Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-14-407

, when he refused to allow the use of blood products because, given his critical injuries and the extended period of time that it took to get to the hospital, the acceptance of the transfusion of blood products could not be deemed to be reasonably essential to the employee's survival.
Williams v. State. Ex Rel. Wyo. Workers'
Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Worker's Compensation Claim), 2009 WY 57, 205 P.3d 1024,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Apr. 21, 2009).

Cited in

Vandre v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., Workers'
Comp. Div. (In re Vandre), 2015 WY 52,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Mar. 31,
2015).

Stated

in

Johnson v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2001 WY 48, 23 P.3d 32,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2001).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Workers' compensation: reasonableness of employee's refusal of medical services tendered by employer, 72 ALR4th 905.

What amounts to failure or refusal to submit to medical treatment sufficient to bar recovery of workers' compensation, 3 ALR5th 907.

Workers'
Compensation: Validity, Construction, and Application of Statutes Providing that Worker Who Suffers Workplace Injury and Subsequently Tests Positive for Alcohol Impairment or Illegal Drug Use Is Not Eligible for Workers'
Compensation Benefits. 22 A.L.R.6th 329.

§ 27-14-408.
Vocational rehabilitation; application; eligibility; plan; limitation; modification, suspension or termination.

An injured employee may apply to the division to participate in a vocational rehabilitation program if:

An award has been made under W.S. 27-14-405(f) and (g) or it is reasonably expected, due to the nature and extent of the injury, that an award will be made under W.S. 27-14-405(f) and (g);

The compensable injury will prevent the employee from returning to any occupation for which the employee has previous training or experience and in which the employee was gainfully employed at any time during the three (3) year period before the injury;

The employee’s injury has not previously resulted in an award for vocational disability, whether denominated loss of earnings, loss of earning capacity or vocational award; and

The employee elects in writing to accept vocational rehabilitation instead of any permanent partial disability award under W.S. 27-14-405(h) and (j) arising from the same physical injury.

Upon receipt of an application, the division shall determine if the employee is eligible for participation in a rehabilitation program pursuant to this section.

Upon final determination of an injured worker’s eligibility for rehabilitation, the division shall immediately send a copy of the application and determination to the local office of the division of vocational rehabilitation of the department of workforce services.

The division of vocational rehabilitation shall upon receipt of the determination of eligibility, immediately provide the injured employee with a written explanation of the rehabilitation services available to injured employees and its procedures for developing and supervising an individualized rehabilitation plan for the employee.

The division of vocational rehabilitation shall in cooperation with the injured employee, develop an individualized rehabilitation plan for the employee agreed to by both the division of vocational rehabilitation and employee, that:

Is reasonably contemplated to restore the employee’s ability to return to former employment, a related occupation or other suitable employment which, to the extent reasonably possible, has an earnings level comparable to the employee’s pre-injury earnings;

Shall not exceed five (5) years or a total cost of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00) unless extended or increased for extenuating circumstances as defined by rule and regulation of the division;

Is the least costly feasible plan consistent with the rehabilitation goal established pursuant to paragraph (e)(i) of this section; and

Includes provisions for living expenses during the rehabilitation plan if the employee is not receiving payments for living expenses from any other government benefit program including worker’s compensation, and other sources of household income are insufficient to pay minimally necessary living expenses, provided the vocational rehabilitation program is pursued as rapidly as possible.

The division may modify, suspend or terminate the participation of an injured worker in the rehabilitation program upon certification by the division of vocational rehabilitation that the injured worker has failed to cooperate or maintain satisfactory progress toward the mutually agreed upon rehabilitation plan goals.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 86, § 1; 1995, ch. 63, § 1; 2009, ch. 156, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (e)(ii), substituted “five (5) years” for “four (4) years.”

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (c).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1994, ch. 86, § 4, provides:

“(a)

The Wyoming legislature determines that:

“(i)

Permanent impairment and disability benefits and participation in vocational rehabilitation programs under the Wyoming Worker's Compensation Act for covered injuries are intended to cover a large portion of the injured worker's economic loss; and

“(ii)

the permanent impairment and disability benefit amount and if applicable, participation in any vocational rehabilitation program available under the Wyoming Worker's Compensation Act constitute the exclusive benefit amount for loss of earnings, extra expenses associated with the injury and vocational rehabilitation.”

Laws 1995, ch. 2, § 2, provides: “The legislature, by adopting this act, intends to clarify the intent of 1994 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 86, Section 5, but does not intend to substantively modify that law. This act intends to clarify that 1994 Wyoming Sessions Laws, Chapter 86, applies only to injuries covered under Wyoming worker's compensation which occur on or after July 1, 1994, and that those covered injuries occurring on or before June 30, 1994 are subject to the law in effect prior to July 1, 1994.”

Savings clauses. —

Laws 1994, ch. 86, § 5, as amended by Laws 1995, ch. 2, § 1, provides: “This act shall not apply to permanent partial and permanent total benefits awarded under the Wyoming Worker's Compensation Act prior to July 1, 1994.”

Cited

in

Nagle v. State ex rel. Wyo. Worker's Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Worker's Comp. Claim of Nagle), 2008 WY 99, 190 P.3d 159,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Aug. 19, 2008).